Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.02
Delayed birth registration; application; fee; certificate registered; documentary evidence, defined.

A notarized application may be filed with the department for a delayed registration of birth of any person born in the State of Nebraska whose birth is not registered within one year after the date of birth. If the birth occurred in the State of Nebraska at any time since the commencement in 1905 of mandatory registration under the laws of Nebraska, the applicant shall pay the statutory file search fee prescribed by section 71-612 to determine that such birth is not recorded. The certificate shall be registered based upon documentary evidence furnished to substantiate the alleged facts of birth. As used in the Delayed Birth Registration Act, unless the context otherwise requires, documentary evidence shall mean independent records each of which was created for a different purpose.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 144;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 419.